Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 6
MITIGATING EFFECT OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS DISCHARGE

12-8-140. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Discharge" means leakage, seepage, or other release of hazardous materials on land or into a river, stream, lake, or other body of water or into the air.

"Hazardous materials" means any material which because of its quantity, concentration, or physical, chemical, or infectious characteristics may:

Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or

Pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or to the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of, or otherwise managed.

"Person" means an individual, partnership, association, corporation, firm, or other entity.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-140

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 810, § 1.)

12-8-141. Immunity for persons providing assistance or advice.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, no person who upon request provides assistance or advice in mitigating or attempting to mitigate the effects of an actual or threatened discharge of hazardous materials or in preventing, or in attempting to prevent, such a discharge shall be subject to civil liabilities or penalties of any type.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of any person for damages or other civil liabilities or penalties of any type resulting from such person's gross negligence or from such person's reckless, wanton, or intentional misconduct.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability for damages or other civil or criminal liabilities or penalties of any type of any person whose conduct caused in whole or in part or contributed to such actual or threatened discharge of hazardous material.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability of any person for civil or criminal liabilities or penalties pursuant to Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter or the legal responsibility of any person to comply with Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the liability for damages or other civil or criminal liabilities or penalties of any person, as defined in this article, who receives or expects to receive compensation or any pecuniary benefit, directly or indirectly, from any source, other than reimbursement for out-of-pocket expenses for services in rendering such assistance or advice.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-141

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 810, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 13, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 7.)

12-8-142. Report of persons providing assistance.

Any person who provides assistance or advice under subsection (a) of Code Section 12-8-141 shall file a written report with the director. The reports shall be filed within five days of the rendering of such assistance or advice and shall detail the assistance and advice rendered and, when applicable, the location and method of disposal of any hazardous materials disposed of as a part of such assistance or advice. This Code section shall not apply to any local, state, or federal agency or government nor to any employee thereof.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-142

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 810, § 1.)